North Carolina statutes. Chapter 120. General Assembly.
Article 8. Elected Officers.

§ 120-37.
Elected officers; salaries; staff. [Effective until July 1, 2022]

At the convening of the first session of the General Assembly following each biennial election of members of the General Assembly, each house shall elect a principal clerk for a term of two years, subject to the condition that each officer shall serve at the pleasure of the house that elected him or her and until his or her successor is elected. The reading clerk and sergeant-at-arms of the Senate shall serve for terms of two years, subject to the condition that each serves at the pleasure of the Senate and until the officer’s successor is elected. The reading clerk and sergeant-at-arms of the House of Representatives shall serve as provided in the rules of the House.

The sergeant at arms and the reading clerk in each house shall be paid a salary of four hundred seventy-two dollars ($472.00) per week plus subsistence at the same daily rate provided for members of the General Assembly, plus mileage at the rate provided for members of the General Assembly for one round trip only from their homes to Raleigh and return. The sergeants at arms shall serve during sessions of the General Assembly and at such time prior to the convening of, and subsequent to adjournment or recess of, sessions as may be authorized by the Legislative Services Commission. The reading clerks shall serve during sessions only.

The principal clerks shall be full-time officers. Each principal clerk shall be entitled to other benefits available to permanent legislative employees and shall be paid an annual salary of one hundred nineteen thousand six hundred fifty dollars ($119,650), payable monthly. Each principal clerk shall also receive such additional compensation as approved by the Speaker of the House of Representatives or the President Pro Tempore of the Senate, respectively, for additional employment duties beyond those provided by the rules of their House. The Legislative Services Commission shall review the salary of the principal clerks prior to submission of the proposed operating budget of the General Assembly to the Governor and shall make appropriate recommendations for changes in those salaries. Any changes enacted by the General Assembly shall be by amendment to this paragraph.

The Legislative Services Commission may authorize additional full-time staff employees of the office of each principal clerk. The Speaker may assign to the Principal Clerk of the House additional duties for the periods between sessions and during recesses of the General Assembly. The President pro tempore of the Senate may assign to the Principal Clerk of the Senate additional duties for the periods between sessions and during recesses of the General Assembly.

The principal clerks and the sergeants-at-arms may, upon authorization of the Legislative Services Commission, employ temporary assistants to prepare for each legislative session, serve during the session, and perform necessary duties following adjournment.

Following adjournment sine die of each session of the General Assembly, each principal clerk shall retain in the clerk’s office for a period of two years every bill and resolution considered by but not enacted or adopted by the clerk’s house, together with the calendar books and other records deemed worthy of retention. At the end of two years, these materials shall be turned over to the Office of Archives and History of the Department of Natural and Cultural Resources for ultimate retention or disposition.

History.

1969, c. 1184, s. 7; 1977, 2nd Sess., c. 1278; 1979, c. 838, s. 82; 1979, 2nd Sess., c. 1137, s. 8; 1981, c. 1127, s. 9; 1983, c. 761, s. 197; 1983 (Reg. Sess., 1984), c. 1034, s. 208; c. 1116, s. 110; 1985, c. 479, ss. 205, 207; c. 757, s. 189; 1985 (Reg. Sess., 1986), c. 1014, ss. 30, 31; 1987, c. 738, ss. 16, 17; 1987 (Reg. Sess., 1988), c. 1086, ss. 10, 11; c. 1100, s. 16(c); 1989, c. 752, ss. 27, 28; 1991, c. 756, s. 34; 1991 (Reg. Sess., 1992), c. 900, ss. 36, 37; 1993, c. 321, ss. 53, 54; 1993 (Reg. Sess., 1994), c. 769, ss. 7.6, 7.7; 1995, c. 507, ss. 7.9, 7.10; 1996, 2nd Ex. Sess., c. 18, ss. 28.7, 28.8; 1997-443, ss. 33.13, 33.14; 1998-153, ss. 10, 11; 1998-212, s. 28.7(a); 1999-237, ss. 28.7, 28.8; 2000-67, ss. 26.7, 26.8; 2001-424, ss. 32.8, 32.9; 2002-159, s. 35(f); 2004-124, ss. 31.8(b), 31.9(b); 2005-276, ss. 29.8, 29.9, 19B.1; 2005-345, s. 40; 2006-66, ss. 22.8, 22.9; 2006-203, s. 61; 2007-323, ss. 28.8, 28.9; 2008-107, ss. 26.8, 26.9; 2012-142, s. 25.1B(b), (c); 2014-100, s. 35.4(b), (c); 2015-241, s. 14.30(s); 2016-94, ss. 36.8, 36.9; 2017-57, ss. 35.6, 35.7; 2018-5, ss. 35.9, 35.10; 2019-177, s. 6; 2019-209, ss. 3.9(a), (a1), 3.10(a), (a1); 2021-180, ss. 39.10(a), 39.11(a).

Section Set Out Twice.

The section above is effective until July 1, 2022. For the section as in effect July 1, 2022, see the following section, also numbered

G.S. 120-37

.

§ 120-37.
Elected officers; salaries; staff. [Effective July 1, 2022]

At the convening of the first session of the General Assembly following each biennial election of members of the General Assembly, each house shall elect a principal clerk for a term of two years, subject to the condition that each officer shall serve at the pleasure of the house that elected him or her and until his or her successor is elected. The reading clerk and sergeant-at-arms of the Senate shall serve for terms of two years, subject to the condition that each serves at the pleasure of the Senate and until the officer’s successor is elected. The reading clerk and sergeant-at-arms of the House of Representatives shall serve as provided in the rules of the House.

The sergeant at arms and the reading clerk in each house shall be paid a salary of four hundred eighty-three dollars ($483.00) per week plus subsistence at the same daily rate provided for members of the General Assembly, plus mileage at the rate provided for members of the General Assembly for one round trip only from their homes to Raleigh and return. The sergeants at arms shall serve during sessions of the General Assembly and at such time prior to the convening of, and subsequent to adjournment or recess of, sessions as may be authorized by the Legislative Services Commission. The reading clerks shall serve during sessions only.

The principal clerks shall be full-time officers. Each principal clerk shall be entitled to other benefits available to permanent legislative employees and shall be paid an annual salary of ($119,650) one hundred twenty-two thousand six hundred forty-two dollars ($122,642), payable monthly. Each principal clerk shall also receive such additional compensation as approved by the Speaker of the House of Representatives or the President Pro Tempore of the Senate, respectively, for additional employment duties beyond those provided by the rules of their House. The Legislative Services Commission shall review the salary of the principal clerks prior to submission of the proposed operating budget of the General Assembly to the Governor and shall make appropriate recommendations for changes in those salaries. Any changes enacted by the General Assembly shall be by amendment to this paragraph.

The Legislative Services Commission may authorize additional full-time staff employees of the office of each principal clerk. The Speaker may assign to the Principal Clerk of the House additional duties for the periods between sessions and during recesses of the General Assembly. The President pro tempore of the Senate may assign to the Principal Clerk of the Senate additional duties for the periods between sessions and during recesses of the General Assembly.

The principal clerks and the sergeants-at-arms may, upon authorization of the Legislative Services Commission, employ temporary assistants to prepare for each legislative session, serve during the session, and perform necessary duties following adjournment.

Following adjournment sine die of each session of the General Assembly, each principal clerk shall retain in the clerk’s office for a period of two years every bill and resolution considered by but not enacted or adopted by the clerk’s house, together with the calendar books and other records deemed worthy of retention. At the end of two years, these materials shall be turned over to the Office of Archives and History of the Department of Natural and Cultural Resources for ultimate retention or disposition.

History.

1969, c. 1184, s. 7; 1977, 2nd Sess., c. 1278; 1979, c. 838, s. 82; 1979, 2nd Sess., c. 1137, s. 8; 1981, c. 1127, s. 9; 1983, c. 761, s. 197; 1983 (Reg. Sess., 1984), c. 1034, s. 208; c. 1116, s. 110; 1985, c. 479, ss. 205, 207; c. 757, s. 189; 1985 (Reg. Sess., 1986), c. 1014, ss. 30, 31; 1987, c. 738, ss. 16, 17; 1987 (Reg. Sess., 1988), c. 1086, ss. 10, 11; c. 1100, s. 16(c); 1989, c. 752, ss. 27, 28; 1991, c. 756, s. 34; 1991 (Reg. Sess., 1992), c. 900, ss. 36, 37; 1993, c. 321, ss. 53, 54; 1993 (Reg. Sess., 1994), c. 769, ss. 7.6, 7.7; 1995, c. 507, ss. 7.9, 7.10; 1996, 2nd Ex. Sess., c. 18, ss. 28.7, 28.8; 1997-443, ss. 33.13, 33.14; 1998-153, ss. 10, 11; 1998-212, s. 28.7(a); 1999-237, ss. 28.7, 28.8; 2000-67, ss. 26.7, 26.8; 2001-424, ss. 32.8, 32.9; 2002-159, s. 35(f); 2004-124, ss. 31.8(b), 31.9(b); 2005-276, ss. 29.8, 29.9, 19B.1; 2005-345, s. 40; 2006-66, ss. 22.8, 22.9; 2006-203, s. 61; 2007-323, ss. 28.8, 28.9; 2008-107, ss. 26.8, 26.9; 2012-142, s. 25.1B(b), (c); 2014-100, s. 35.4(b), (c); 2015-241, s. 14.30(s); 2016-94, ss. 36.8, 36.9; 2017-57, ss. 35.6, 35.7; 2018-5, ss. 35.9, 35.10; 2019-177, s. 6; 2019-209, ss. 3.9(a), (a1), 3.10(a), (a1); 2021-180, ss. 39.10(a), (b), 39.11(a), (b).

Section Set Out Twice.

The section above is effective July 1, 2022. For the section as in effect until July 1, 2022, see the preceding section, also numbered

G.S. 120-37

.

§§ 120-38,
120-39.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 1969, c. 1184, s. 7.